Illinois, session 104th, SB3890.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 10. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act. 6    Section 11. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    (a) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is 8controlled by, or is under common control with another legal 9entity. As used in this definition, "control" or "controlled" 10means: ownership of or the power to vote more than 50% of the 11outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a 12company; control in any manner over the election of a majority 13of the directors or of individuals exercising similar 14functions; or the power to exercise a controlling influence 15over the management of a company.16    (b) "Authenticate" means to use reasonable means to 17determine that a request to exercise any of the rights under 18Section 14, subsection (1), paragraphs (b) to (h), is being 19made by or rightfully on behalf of the consumer who is entitled 20to exercise the rights with respect to the personal data at 21issue.22    (c) "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic 23measurements of an individual's biological characteristics,   SB3890- 2 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1including a fingerprint, a voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or 2other unique biological patterns or characteristics that are 3used to identify a specific individual. Biometric data does 4not include:5        (1) a digital or physical photograph;6        (2) an audio or video recording; or7        (3) any data generated from a digital or physical 8    photograph, or an audio or video recording, unless the 9    data is generated to identify a specific individual.10    (d) "Child" has the meaning given in United States Code, 11Title 15, Section 6501.12    (e) "Consent" means any freely given, specific, informed, 13and unambiguous indication of the consumer's wishes by which 14the consumer signifies agreement to the processing of personal 15data relating to the consumer. Acceptance of general or broad 16terms of use or similar document that contains descriptions of 17personal data processing along with other, unrelated 18information does not constitute consent. Hovering over, 19muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content does not 20constitute consent. A consent is not valid when the consumer's 21indication has been obtained by a dark pattern. A consumer may 22revoke consent previously given consistent with this Act.23    (f) "Consumer" means a natural person who is an Illinois 24resident acting only in an individual or household context. 25Consumer does not include a natural person acting in a 26commercial or employment context.  SB3890- 3 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    (g) "Controller" means the natural or legal person who, 2alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and 3means of the processing of personal data.4    (h) "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant 5effects concerning the consumer" means decisions made by the 6controller that result in the provision or denial by the 7controller of financial or lending services, housing, 8insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal 9justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or 10access to essential goods or services.11    (i) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or 12manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or 13impairing user autonomy, decision making, or choice. 14    (j) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably 15be used to infer information about or otherwise be linked to an 16identified or identifiable natural person or a device linked 17to an identified or identifiable natural person, provided that 18the controller that possesses the data:19        (1) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data 20    cannot be associated with a natural person;21        (2) publicly commits to process the data only in a 22    deidentified fashion and not attempt to reidentify the 23    data; and24        (3) contractually obligates any recipients of the 25    information to comply with all provisions of this 26    definition.  SB3890- 4 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    (k) "Delete" means to remove or destroy information so 2that it is not maintained in human- or machine-readable form 3and cannot be retrieved or used in the ordinary course of 4business.5    (l) "Genetic information" means information about an 6identifiable individual derived from the presence, absence, 7alteration, or mutation of a gene, or the presence or absence 8of a specific DNA or RNA marker, which has been obtained from 9an analysis of:10        (1) the individual's biological information or 11    specimen; or12        (2) the biological information or specimen of a person 13    to whom the individual is related.14    "Genetic information" also means medical or biological 15information collected from an individual about a particular 16genetic condition that is or might be used to provide medical 17care to that individual or the individual's family members.18    (m) "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a 19person who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.20    (n) "Known child" means a person under circumstances in 21which a controller has actual knowledge of, or willfully 22disregards, that the person is under 13 years of age.23    (o) "Personal data" means any information that is linked 24or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable 25natural person. Personal data does not include deidentified 26data or publicly available information. As used in this   SB3890- 5 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1definition, "publicly available information" means information 2that (1) is lawfully made available from federal, state, or 3local government records or widely distributed media; or (2) a 4controller has a reasonable basis to believe has lawfully been 5made available to the general public.6    (p) "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set 7of operations that are performed on personal data or on sets of 8personal data, whether or not by automated means, including, 9but not limited to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, 10analysis, deletion, or modification of personal data.11    (q) "Processor" means a natural or legal person who 12processes personal data on behalf of a controller.13    (r) "Profiling" means any form of automated processing of 14personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal 15aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural 16person's economic situation, health, personal preferences, 17interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.18    (s) "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be 19attributed to a specific natural person without the use of 20additional information, provided that the additional 21information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate 22technical and organizational measures to ensure that the 23personal data are not attributed to an identified or 24identifiable natural person.25    (t) "Sale", "sell", or "sold" means the exchange of 26personal data for monetary or other valuable consideration by   SB3890- 6 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1the controller to a third party. "Sale" does not include the 2following:3        (1) the disclosure of personal data to a processor who 4    processes the personal data on behalf of the controller;5        (2) the disclosure of personal data to a third party 6    for purposes of providing a product or service requested 7    by the consumer;8        (3) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an 9    affiliate of the controller; 10        (4) the disclosure of information that the consumer 11    intentionally made available to the general public via a 12    channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 13    audience;14        (5) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 15    third party as an asset that is part of a completed or 16    proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other 17    transaction in which the third party assumes control of 18    all or part of the controller's assets; or19        (6) the exchange of personal data between the producer 20    of a good or service and authorized agents of the producer 21    who sell and service the goods and services to enable the 22    cooperative provisioning of goods and services by both the 23    producer and the producer's agents.24    (u) "Sensitive data" is a form of personal data. 25"Sensitive data" means:26        (1) personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin,   SB3890- 7 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    religious beliefs, mental or physical health condition or 2    diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or 3    immigration status;4        (2) the processing of biometric data or genetic 5    information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an 6    individual;7        (3) the personal data of a known child; or8        (4) specific geolocation data.9    (v) "Specific geolocation data" means information derived 10from technology, including, but not limited to, global 11positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or 12other mechanisms that directly identifies the geographic 13coordinates of a consumer or a device linked to a consumer with 14an accuracy of more than 3 decimal degrees of latitude and 15longitude or the equivalent in an alternative geographic 16coordinate system or a street address derived from the 17coordinates. Specific geolocation data does not include the 18content of communications, the contents of databases 19containing street address information that are accessible to 20the public as authorized by law, or any data generated by or 21connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems 22or other equipment for use by a public utility.23    (w) "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements 24to a consumer in which the advertisement is selected based on 25personal data obtained or inferred from the consumer's 26activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or   SB3890- 8 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1online applications to predict the consumer's preferences or 2interests. Targeted advertising does not include:3        (1) advertising based on activities within a 4    controller's own websites or online applications;5        (2) advertising based on the context of a consumer's 6    current search query or visit to a website or online 7    application;8        (3) advertising to a consumer in response to the 9    consumer's request for information or feedback; or10        (4) processing personal data solely for measuring or 11    reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency.12    "Technology provider" means a person who:13        (1) contracts with a public educational agency or 14    institution, as part of a one-to-one program or otherwise, 15    to provide a school-issued device for student use; and16        (2) creates, receives, or maintains educational data 17    pursuant or incidental to a contract with a public 18    educational agency or institution.19    (x) "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public 20authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, 21controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the 22controller.23    (y) "Trade secret" means information, including a formula, 24pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or 25process, that:26        (1) derives independent economic value, actual or   SB3890- 9 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    potential, from not being generally known to, and not 2    being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other 3    persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure 4    or use, and5        (2) is the subject of efforts that are reasonable 6    under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.7    The existence of a trade secret is not negated merely 8because an employee or other person has acquired the trade 9secret without express or specific notice that it is a trade 10secret if, under all the circumstances, the employee or other 11person knows or has reason to know that the owner intends or 12expects the secrecy of the type of information comprising the 13trade secret to be maintained. 14    Section 12. Scope; exclusions. 15    (a)(1) Scope. This Act applies to legal entities that 16conduct business in Illinois or produce products or services 17that are targeted to Illinois residents, and that satisfy one 18or more of the following thresholds:19        (A) during a calendar year, controls or processes 20    personal data of 100,000 consumers or more, excluding 21    personal data controlled or processed solely for the 22    purpose of completing a payment transaction; or23        (B) derives over 25% of gross revenue from the sale of 24    personal data and processes or controls personal data of 25    25,000 consumers or more.  SB3890- 10 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    (2) A controller or processor shall comply with the 2Student Online Personal Protection Act, except that when the 3provisions of that Act conflict with this Act, this Act 4prevails.5    (b) Exclusions. The provisions of this Act do not apply to 6the following entities, activities, or types of information:7        (1) the State, a political subdivision of the State, 8    and units of local government;9        (2) a federally recognized Indian tribe;10        (3) information that meets the definition of:11            (A) protected health information, as defined by 12        and for purposes of the Health Insurance Portability 13        and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, 14        and related regulations;15            (B) health records, that includes, but is not 16        limited to, any information, whether oral or recorded 17        in any form or medium, that relates to the past, 18        present, or future physical or mental health or 19        condition of a patient; the provision of health care 20        to a patient; or the past, present, or future payment 21        for the provision of health care to a patient;22            (C) patient identifying information for purposes 23        of Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 2, 24        established pursuant to the United States Code, Title 25        42, Section 290dd-2;26            (D) identifiable private information for purposes   SB3890- 11 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        of the federal policy for the protection of human 2        subjects, the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, 3        Part 46; identifiable private information that is 4        otherwise information collected as part of human 5        subjects research under the good clinical practice 6        guidelines issued by the International Council for 7        Harmonisation; the protection of human subjects under 8        the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 21, Parts 50 9        and 56; or personal data used or shared in research 10        conducted in accordance with one or more of the 11        requirements set forth in this paragraph;12            (E) information and documents created for purposes 13        of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 14        1986, Public Law 99-660, and related regulations; or15            (F) patient safety work product for purposes of 16        Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 3, 17        established under the United States Code, Title 42, 18        Sections 299b-21 to 299b-26;19        (4) information that is derived from any of the health 20    care-related information listed in clause (3), but that 21    has been deidentified in accordance with the requirements 22    for deidentification set forth in the Code of Federal 23    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164; 24        (5) information originating from, and intermingled to 25    be indistinguishable with, any of the health care-related 26    information listed in clause (3) that is maintained by:  SB3890- 12 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1            (A) a covered entity or business associate, as 2        defined by the Health Insurance Portability and 3        Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and 4        related regulations;5            (B) a health care provider, to include, but not be 6        limited to, any public or private facility that 7        provides, on an inpatient or outpatient basis, 8        preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, convalescent, 9        rehabilitation, mental health, or intellectual 10        disability services, including general or special 11        hospitals, skilled nursing homes, extended care 12        facilities, intermediate care facilities and mental 13        health centers; or14            (C) a program or a qualified service organization, 15        as defined by Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, 16        Part 2, established pursuant to United States Code, 17        Title 42, Section 290dd-2;18        (6) information that is:19            (A) maintained by an entity that meets the 20        definition of health care provider under the Code of 21        Federal Regulations, Title 45, Section 160.103, to the 22        extent that the entity maintains the information in 23        the manner required of covered entities with respect 24        to protected health information for purposes of the 25        Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 26        1996, Public Law 104-191, and related regulations;  SB3890- 13 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1            (B) included in a limited data set, as described 2        under the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, Part 3        164.514(e), to the extent that the information is 4        used, disclosed, and maintained in the manner 5        specified by that part;6            (C) maintained by, or maintained to comply with 7        the rules or orders of, a self-regulatory organization 8        as defined by the United States Code, Title 15, 9        Section 78c(a)(26);10            (D) originated from, or intermingled with, 11        information described in clause (9) and that a 12        residential mortgage originator or residential 13        mortgage servicer regulated under the Residential 14        Mortgage License Act of 1987 collects, processes, 15        uses, or maintains in the same manner as required 16        under the laws and regulations specified in paragraph 17        (9); or18            (E) originated from, or intermingled with, 19        information described in clause (9) and that a nonbank 20        financial institution collects, processes, uses, or 21        maintains in the same manner as required under the 22        laws and regulations specified in paragraph (9);23        (7) information used only for public health activities 24    and purposes, as described under the Code of Federal 25    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164.512;26        (8) an activity involving the collection, maintenance,   SB3890- 14 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any personal 2    data bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit 3    standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, 4    personal characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer 5    reporting agency, as defined in the United States Code, 6    Title 15, Section 1681a(f), by a furnisher of information, 7    as set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 8    1681s-2, who provides information for use in a consumer 9    report, as defined in the United States Code, Title 15, 10    Section 1681a(d), and by a user of a consumer report, as 11    set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 12    1681b, except that information is only excluded under this 13    paragraph to the extent that the activity involving the 14    collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, 15    or use of the information by the agency, furnisher, or 16    user is subject to regulation under the federal Fair 17    Credit Reporting Act, United States Code, Title 15, 18    Sections 1681 to 1681x, and the information is not 19    collected, maintained, used, communicated, disclosed, or 20    sold except as authorized by the Fair Credit Reporting 21    Act;22        (9) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 23    disclosed under the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, Public 24    Law 106-102, and implementing regulations, if the 25    collection, processing, sale, or disclosure is in 26    compliance with that law;   SB3890- 15 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (10) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 2    disclosed pursuant to the federal Driver's Privacy 3    Protection Act of 1994, United States Code, Title 18, 4    Sections 2721 to 2725, if the collection, processing, 5    sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that law;6        (11) personal data regulated by the federal Family 7    Educational Rights and Privacy Act, United States Code, 8    Title 20, Section 1232g, and implementing regulations;9        (12) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 10    disclosed pursuant to the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971, 11    as amended, United States Code, Title 12, Sections 2001 to 12    2279cc, and implementing regulations, Code of Federal 13    Regulations, Title 12, Part 600, if the collection, 14    processing, sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that 15    law;16        (13) data collected or maintained:17            (A) in the course of an individual acting as a job 18        applicant to or an employee, owner, director, officer, 19        medical staff member, or contractor of a business if 20        the data is collected and used solely within the 21        context of the role;22            (B) as the emergency contact information of an 23        individual under subparagraph (A) if used solely for 24        emergency contact purposes; or25            (C) that is necessary for the business to retain 26        to administer benefits for another individual relating   SB3890- 16 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        to the individual under subparagraph (A) if used 2        solely for the purposes of administering those 3        benefits;4        (14) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 5    disclosed under the Illinois Insurance Code;6        (15) data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed as 7    part of a payment-only credit, check, or cash transaction 8    where no data about consumers, as defined in Section 11, 9    are retained;10        (16) a State or federally chartered bank or credit 11    union, or an affiliate or subsidiary that is principally 12    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 13    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k);14        (17) information that originates from, or is 15    intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from, 16    information described in paragraph (8) and that a person 17    collects, processes, uses, or maintains in the same manner 18    as is required under the laws and regulations specified in 19    paragraph (8);20        (18) an insurance company and an insurance producer 21    that are regulated by the State under the Illinois 22    Insurance Code, a third-party administrator of 23    self-insurance, or an affiliate or subsidiary of any 24    entity identified in this clause that is principally 25    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 26    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k), except that   SB3890- 17 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    this clause does not apply to a person that, alone or in 2    combination with another person, establishes and maintains 3    a self-insurance program that does not otherwise engage in 4    the business of entering into policies of insurance;5        (19) a small business, as defined by the United States 6    Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 7    Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, except that a small 8    business identified in this clause is subject to Section 9    17;10        (20) a nonprofit organization that is established to 11    detect and prevent fraudulent acts in connection with 12    insurance; and 13        (21) an air carrier subject to the federal Airline 14    Deregulation Act, Public Law 95-504, only to the extent 15    that an air carrier collects personal data related to 16    prices, routes, or services and only to the extent that 17    the provisions of the Airline Deregulation Act preempt the 18    requirements of this Act.19    Controllers that are in compliance with the Children's 20Online Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, 21Sections 6501 to 6506, and implementing regulations, are 22deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental 23consent under this Act. 24    Section 13. Responsibility according to role. 25    (a) Controllers and processors are responsible for meeting   SB3890- 18 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1the respective obligations established under this Act.2    (b) Processors are responsible under this Act for adhering 3to the instructions of the controller and assisting the 4controller to meet the controller's obligations under this 5Act. Assistance under this subsection shall include the 6following:7        (1) taking into account the nature of the processing, 8    the processor shall assist the controller by appropriate 9    technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is 10    possible, for the fulfillment of the controller's 11    obligation to respond to consumer requests to exercise 12    their rights under Section 14; and13        (2) taking into account the nature of processing and 14    the information available to the processor, the processor 15    shall assist the controller in meeting the controller's 16    obligations in relation to the security of processing the 17    personal data and in relation to the notification of a 18    breach of the security of the system under the Illinois 19    Personal Information Protection Act and provide 20    information to the controller necessary to enable the 21    controller to conduct and document any data privacy and 22    protection assessments required by Section 18.23    (c) A contract between a controller and a processor shall 24govern the processor's data processing procedures with respect 25to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The 26contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions   SB3890- 19 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1for processing data, the nature and purpose of processing, the 2type of data subject to processing, the duration of 3processing, and the rights and obligations of both parties. 4The contract shall also require that the processor:5        (1) ensure that each person processing the personal 6    data is subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect 7    to the data; and8        (2) engage a subcontractor only (i) after providing 9    the controller with an opportunity to object, and (ii) 10    pursuant to a written contract in accordance with 11    subsection (e) that requires the subcontractor to meet the 12    obligations of the processor with respect to the personal 13    data.14    (d) Taking into account the context of processing, the 15controller and the processor shall implement appropriate 16technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of 17security appropriate to the risk and establish a clear 18allocation of the responsibilities between the controller and 19the processor to implement the technical and organizational 20measures.21    (e) Processing by a processor shall be governed by a 22contract between the controller and the processor that is 23binding on both parties and that sets out the processing 24instructions to which the processor is bound, including the 25nature and purpose of the processing, the type of personal 26data subject to the processing, the duration of the   SB3890- 20 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1processing, and the obligations and rights of both parties. 2The contract shall include the requirements imposed by this 3subsection, subsections (c) and (d), as well as the following 4requirements:5        (1) at the choice of the controller, the processor 6    shall delete or return all personal data to the controller 7    as requested at the end of the provision of services, 8    unless retention of the personal data is required by law;9        (2) upon a reasonable request from the controller, the 10    processor shall make available to the controller all 11    information necessary to demonstrate compliance with the 12    obligations in this Act; and13        (3) the processor shall allow for, and contribute to, 14    reasonable assessments and inspections by the controller 15    or the controller's designated assessor. Alternatively, 16    the processor may arrange for a qualified and independent 17    assessor to conduct, at least annually and at the 18    processor's expense, an assessment of the processor's 19    policies and technical and organizational measures in 20    support of the obligations under this Act. The assessor 21    must use an appropriate and accepted control standard or 22    framework and assessment procedure for assessments as 23    applicable, and shall provide a report of an assessment to 24    the controller upon request.25    (f) In no event shall any contract relieve a controller or 26a processor from the liabilities imposed on a controller or   SB3890- 21 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1processor by virtue of the controller's or processor's roles 2in the processing relationship under this Act.3    (g) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller 4or processor with respect to a specific processing of data is a 5fact-based determination that depends upon the context in 6which personal data are to be processed. A person that is not 7limited in the person's processing of personal data pursuant 8to a controller's instructions, or that fails to adhere to a 9controller's instructions, is a controller and not a processor 10with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor 11that continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with 12respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a 13processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with 14others, determining the purposes and means of the processing 15of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect 16to the processing. 17    Section 14. Consumer personal data rights. 18    (a)(1) Consumer rights provided. Except as provided in 19this Act, a controller must comply with a request to exercise 20the consumer rights provided in this subdivision.21    (2) A consumer has the right to confirm whether or not a 22controller is processing personal data concerning the consumer 23and access the categories of personal data the controller is 24processing.25    (3) A consumer has the right to correct inaccurate   SB3890- 22 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1personal data concerning the consumer taking into account the 2nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing 3of the personal data.4    (4) A consumer has the right to delete personal data 5concerning the consumer.6    (5) A consumer has the right to obtain personal data 7concerning the consumer, which the consumer previously 8provided to the controller, in a portable and, to the extent 9technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the 10consumer to transmit the data to another controller without 11hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated 12means.13    (6) A consumer has the right to opt out of the processing 14of personal data concerning the consumer for purposes of 15targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling 16in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal 17effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects 18concerning a consumer.19    (7) If a consumer's personal data is profiled in 20furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects concerning 21a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a 22consumer, the consumer has the right to question the result of 23the profiling, to be informed of the reason that the profiling 24resulted in the decision, and, if feasible, to be informed of 25what actions the consumer might have taken to secure a 26different decision and the actions that the consumer might   SB3890- 23 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1take to secure a different decision in the future. The 2consumer has the right to review the consumer's personal data 3used in the profiling. If the decision is determined to have 4been based upon inaccurate personal data taking into account 5the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the 6processing of the personal data, the consumer has the right to 7have the data corrected and the profiling decision reevaluated 8based upon the corrected data.9    (8) A consumer has a right to obtain a list of the specific 10third parties to which the controller has disclosed the 11consumer's personal data. If the controller does not maintain 12the information in a format specific to the consumer, a list of 13specific third parties to whom the controller has disclosed 14any consumers' personal data may be provided instead.15    (b)(1) Exercising consumer rights. A consumer may exercise 16the rights set forth in this Section by submitting a request, 17at any time, to a controller specifying which rights the 18consumer wishes to exercise.19    (2) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 20known child, the parent or legal guardian of the known child 21may exercise the rights under this Act on the child's behalf.22    (3) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 23consumer legally subject to guardianship under the Probate Act 24of 1975, the guardian of the consumer may exercise the rights 25under this Act on the consumer's behalf.26    (4) A consumer may designate another person as the   SB3890- 24 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1consumer's authorized agent to exercise the consumer's right 2to opt out of the processing of the consumer's personal data 3for purposes of targeted advertising and sale under paragraph 4(6), on the consumer's behalf. A consumer may designate an 5authorized agent by way of, among other things, a technology, 6including, but not limited to, an Internet link or a browser 7setting, browser extension, or global device setting, 8indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing. 9A controller shall comply with an opt-out request received 10from an authorized agent if the controller is able to verify, 11with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the 12consumer and the authorized agent's authority to act on the 13consumer's behalf.14    (c)(1) Universal opt-out mechanisms. A controller must 15allow a consumer to opt out of any processing of the consumer's 16personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, or any 17sale of the consumer's personal data through an opt-out 18preference signal sent, with the consumer's consent, by a 19platform, technology, or mechanism to the controller 20indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing 21or sale. The platform, technology, or mechanism must:22        (A) not unfairly disadvantage another controller;23        (B) not make use of a default setting but require the 24    consumer to make an affirmative, freely given, and 25    unambiguous choice to opt out of the processing of the 26    consumer's personal data;   SB3890- 25 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (C) be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the 2    average consumer;3        (D) be as consistent as possible with any other 4    similar platform, technology, or mechanism required by any 5    federal or State law or regulation; and6        (E) enable the controller to accurately determine 7    whether the consumer is an Illinois resident and whether 8    the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of 9    any sale of the consumer's personal data or targeted 10    advertising. For purposes of this paragraph, the use of an 11    Internet protocol address to estimate the consumer's 12    location is sufficient to determine the consumer's 13    residence.14    (2) If a consumer's opt-out request is exercised through 15the platform, technology, or mechanism required under 16paragraph (a), and the request conflicts with the consumer's 17existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary 18participation in a controller's bona fide loyalty, rewards, 19premium features, discounts, or club card program, the 20controller must comply with the consumer's opt-out preference 21signal but may also notify the consumer of the conflict and 22provide the consumer a choice to confirm the 23controller-specific privacy setting or participation in the 24controller's program.25    (3) The platform, technology, or mechanism required under 26paragraph (a) is subject to the requirements of subdivision 4.  SB3890- 26 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    (4) A controller that recognizes opt-out preference 2signals that have been approved by other state laws or 3regulations is in compliance with this subdivision.4    (d)(1) Except as provided in this Act, a controller must 5comply with a request to exercise the rights under this 6Section.7    (2) A controller must provide one or more secure and 8reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise 9the consumer's rights under this Section. The means made 10available must take into account the ways in which consumers 11interact with the controller and the need for secure and 12reliable communication of the requests.13    (3) A controller may not require a consumer to create a new 14account to exercise a right, but a controller may require a 15consumer to use an existing account to exercise the consumer's 16rights under this Section.17    (4) A controller must comply with a request to exercise 18the right in this Section, as soon as feasibly possible, but no 19later than 45 days of receipt of the request.20    (5) A controller must inform a consumer of any action 21taken on a request under this Section without undue delay and 22in any event within 45 days of receipt of the request. That 23period may be extended once by 45 additional days where 24reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and 25number of the requests. The controller must inform the 26consumer of any extension within 45 days of receipt of the   SB3890- 27 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1request, together with the reasons for the delay.2    (6) If a controller does not take action on a consumer's 3request, the controller must inform the consumer without undue 4delay and at the latest within 45 days of receipt of the 5request of the reasons for not taking action and instructions 6for how to appeal the decision with the controller as 7described in this Section.8    (7) Information provided under this Section must be 9provided by the controller free of charge up to twice annually 10to the consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly 11unfounded or excessive, in particular because of the 12repetitive character of the requests, the controller may 13either charge a reasonable fee to cover the administrative 14costs of complying with the request or refuse to act on the 15request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the 16manifestly unfounded or excessive character of the request.17    (8) A controller is not required to comply with a request 18to exercise any of the rights under this Section, if the 19controller is unable to authenticate the request using 20commercially reasonable efforts. In such cases, the controller 21may request the provision of additional information reasonably 22necessary to authenticate the request. A controller is not 23required to authenticate an opt-out request, but a controller 24may deny an opt-out request if the controller has a good faith, 25reasonable, and documented belief that the request is 26fraudulent. If a controller denies an opt-out request because   SB3890- 28 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1the controller believes a request is fraudulent, the 2controller must notify the person who made the request that 3the request was denied because of the controller's belief that 4the request was fraudulent and state the controller's basis 5for that belief.6    (9) In response to a consumer request under this Section, 7a controller must not disclose the following information about 8a consumer but must instead inform the consumer with 9sufficient particularity that the controller has collected 10that type of information:11        (A) Social Security number;12        (B) driver's license number or other government-issued 13    identification number;14        (C) financial account number;15        (D) health insurance account number or medical 16    identification number;17        (E) account password, security questions, or answers; 18    or19        (F) biometric data.20    (10) In response to a consumer request under subdivision 211, a controller is not required to reveal any trade secret.22    (11) A controller that has obtained personal data about a 23consumer from a source other than the consumer may comply with 24a consumer's request to delete the consumer's personal data 25pursuant to this Section, by either:26        (A) retaining a record of the deletion request,   SB3890- 29 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    retaining the minimum data necessary for the purpose of 2    ensuring the consumer's personal data remains deleted from 3    the business's records and not using the retained data for 4    any other purpose under the provisions of this Act; or5        (B) opting the consumer out of the processing of 6    personal data for any purpose except for the purposes 7    exempted pursuant to the provisions of this Act.8    (e)(1) A controller must establish an internal process in 9which a consumer may appeal a refusal to take action on a 10request to exercise any of the rights under this Section 11within a reasonable period of time after the consumer's 12receipt of the notice sent by the controller under this 13Section.14    (2) The appeal process must be conspicuously available. 15The process must include the ease of use provisions in this 16Section 3 applicable to submitting requests.17    (3) Within 45 days of receipt of an appeal, a controller 18must inform the consumer of any action taken or not taken in 19response to the appeal along with a written explanation of the 20reasons in support thereof. That period may be extended by 60 21additional days if reasonably necessary, taking into account 22the complexity and number of the requests serving as the basis 23for the appeal. The controller must inform the consumer of any 24extension within 45 days of receipt of the appeal together 25with the reasons for the delay.26    (4) When informing a consumer of any action taken or not   SB3890- 30 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1taken in response to an appeal pursuant to paragraph (c), the 2controller must provide a written explanation of the reasons 3for the controller's decision and clearly and prominently 4provide the consumer with information about how to file a 5complaint with the Attorney General. The controller must 6maintain records of all appeals and the controller's responses 7for at least 24 months and shall, upon written request by the 8Attorney General as part of an investigation, compile and 9provide a copy of the records to the Attorney General. 10    Section 15. Processing deidentified data or pseudonymous 11data. 12    (a) This Act does not require a controller or processor to 13do any of the following solely for purposes of complying with 14this Act:15        (1) reidentify deidentified data;16        (2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, 17    obtain, retain, or access any data or technology, to be 18    capable of associating an authenticated consumer request 19    with personal data; or20        (3) comply with an authenticated consumer request to 21    access, correct, delete, or port personal data under 22    Section 14, if all of the following are true:23            (A) the controller is not reasonably capable of 24        associating the request with the personal data, or it 25        would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to   SB3890- 31 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        associate the request with the personal data;2            (B) the controller does not use the personal data 3        to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who 4        is the subject of the personal data or associate the 5        personal data with other personal data about the same 6        specific consumer; and7            (C) the controller does not sell the personal data 8        to any third party or otherwise voluntarily disclose 9        the personal data to any third party other than a 10        processor, except as otherwise permitted in this 11        Section.12    (b) The rights contained in Section 14, subsection (1), 13paragraphs (b) to (e) and (h), do not apply to pseudonymous 14data in cases where the controller is able to demonstrate any 15information necessary to identify the consumer is kept 16separately and is subject to effective technical and 17organizational controls that prevent the controller from 18accessing the information.19    (c) A controller that uses pseudonymous data or 20deidentified data must exercise reasonable oversight to 21monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which 22the pseudonymous data or deidentified data are subject, and 23must take appropriate steps to address any breaches of 24contractual commitments.25    (d) A processor or third party must not attempt to 26identify the subjects of deidentified or pseudonymous data   SB3890- 32 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1without the express authority of the controller that caused 2the data to be deidentified or pseudonymized.3    (e) A controller, processor, or third party must not 4attempt to identify the subjects of data that has been 5collected with only pseudonymous identifiers. 6    Section 16. Responsibilities of controllers. 7    (a)(1) Transparency obligations. Controllers must provide 8consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful 9privacy notice that includes:10        (A) the categories of personal data processed by the 11    controller;12        (B) the purposes for which the categories of personal 13    data are processed;14        (C) an explanation of the rights contained in Section 15    14 and how and where consumers may exercise those rights, 16    including how a consumer may appeal a controller's action 17    with regard to the consumer's request;18        (D) the categories of personal data that the 19    controller sells to or shares with third parties, if any;20        (E) the categories of third parties, if any, with whom 21    the controller sells or shares personal data;22        (F) the controller's contact information, including an 23    active email address or other online mechanism that the 24    consumer may use to contact the controller;25        (G) a description of the controller's retention   SB3890- 33 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    policies for personal data; and2        (H) the date the privacy notice was last updated.3    (2) If a controller sells personal data to third parties, 4processes personal data for targeted advertising, or engages 5in profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal 6effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects 7concerning a consumer, the controller must disclose the 8processing in the privacy notice and provide access to a clear 9and conspicuous method outside the privacy notice for a 10consumer to opt out of the sale, processing, or profiling in 11furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects concerning 12a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a 13consumer. This method may include but is not limited to an 14Internet hyperlink clearly labeled "Your Opt-Out Rights" or 15"Your Privacy Rights" that directly effectuates the opt-out 16request or takes consumers to a web page where the consumer can 17make the opt-out request.18    (3) The privacy notice must be made available to the 19public in each language in which the controller provides a 20product or service that is subject to the privacy notice or 21carries out activities related to the product or service.22    (4) The controller must provide the privacy notice in a 23manner that is reasonably accessible to and usable by 24individuals with disabilities.25    (5) Whenever a controller makes a material change to the 26controller's privacy notice or practices, the controller must   SB3890- 34 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1notify consumers affected by the material change with respect 2to any prospectively collected personal data and provide a 3reasonable opportunity for consumers to withdraw consent to 4any further materially different collection, processing, or 5transfer of previously collected personal data under the 6changed policy. The controller shall take all reasonable 7electronic measures to provide notification regarding material 8changes to affected consumers, taking into account available 9technology and the nature of the relationship.10    (6) A controller is not required to provide a separate 11Illinois-specific privacy notice or section of a privacy 12notice if the controller's general privacy notice contains all 13the information required by this Section.14    (7) The privacy notice must be posted online through a 15conspicuous hyperlink using the word "privacy" on the 16controller's website home page or on a mobile application's 17app store page or download page. A controller that maintains 18an application on a mobile or other device shall also include a 19hyperlink to the privacy notice in the application's settings 20menu or in a similarly conspicuous and accessible location. A 21controller that does not operate a website shall make the 22privacy notice conspicuously available to consumers through a 23medium regularly used by the controller to interact with 24consumers, including, but not limited to, mail.25    (b)(1) A controller must limit the collection of personal 26data to what is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary   SB3890- 35 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1in relation to the purposes for which the data are processed, 2which must be disclosed to the consumer.3    (2) Except as provided in this Act, a controller may not 4process personal data for purposes that are not reasonably 5necessary to, or compatible with, the purposes for which the 6personal data are processed, as disclosed to the consumer, 7unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent.8    (3) A controller shall establish, implement, and maintain 9reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data 10security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, 11and accessibility of personal data, including the maintenance 12of an inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 13these responsibilities. The data security practices shall be 14appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at 15issue.16    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a controller 17may not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without 18obtaining the consumer's consent, or, in the case of the 19processing of personal data concerning a known child, without 20obtaining consent from the child's parent or lawful guardian, 21in accordance with the requirement of the Children's Online 22Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, Sections 236501 to 6506, and its implementing regulations.24    (5) A controller shall provide an effective mechanism for 25a consumer, or, in the case of the processing of personal data 26concerning a known child, the child's parent or lawful   SB3890- 36 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1guardian, to revoke previously given consent under this 2subsection. The mechanism provided shall be at least as easy 3as the mechanism by which the consent was previously given. 4Upon revocation of consent, a controller shall cease to 5process the applicable data as soon as practicable, but no 6later than 15 days after the receipt of the request.7    (6) A controller may not process the personal data of a 8consumer for purposes of targeted advertising, or sell the 9consumer's personal data, without the consumer's consent, 10under circumstances in which the controller knows that the 11consumer is between the ages of 13 and 16.12    (7) A controller may not retain personal data that is no 13longer relevant and reasonably necessary in relation to the 14purposes for which the data were collected and processed, 15unless retention of the data is otherwise required by law or 16permitted under Section 19.17    (c)(1) Nondiscrimination. A controller shall not process 18personal data on the basis of a consumer's or a class of 19consumers' actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, 20religion, national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, 21sexual orientation, familial status, lawful source of income, 22or disability in a manner that unlawfully discriminates 23against the consumer or class of consumers with respect to the 24offering or provision of: housing, employment, credit, or 25education; or the goods, services, facilities, privileges, 26advantages, or accommodations of any place of public   SB3890- 37 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1accommodation.2    (2) A controller may not discriminate against a consumer 3for exercising any of the rights contained in this Act, 4including denying goods or services to the consumer, charging 5different prices or rates for goods or services, and providing 6a different level of quality of goods and services to the 7consumer. This does not: (i) require a controller to provide a 8good or service that requires the consumer's personal data 9that the controller does not collect or maintain; or (ii) 10prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, 11level, quality, or selection of goods or services to a 12consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if 13the offering is in connection with a consumer's voluntary 14participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium 15features, discounts, or club card program.16    (d) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind 17that purports to waive or limit in any way a consumer's rights 18under this Act is contrary to public policy and is void and 19unenforceable. 20    Section 17. Requirements for small businesses. 21    (a) A small business, as defined by the United States 22Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 23Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, that conducts business in 24Illinois or produces products or services that are targeted to 25Illinois residents must not sell a consumer's sensitive data   SB3890- 38 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1without the consumer's prior consent.2    (b) Penalties and Attorney General enforcement procedures 3under Section 20 apply to a small business that violates this 4Section. 5    Section 18. Data privacy policies; data privacy and 6protection assessments. 7    (a) A controller must document and maintain a description 8of the policies and procedures the controller has adopted to 9comply with this Act. The description must include, where 10applicable:11        (1) the name and contact information for the 12    controller's chief privacy officer or other individual 13    with primary responsibility for directing the policies and 14    procedures implemented to comply with the provisions of 15    this Act; and16        (2) a description of the controller's data privacy 17    policies and procedures that reflect the requirements in 18    Section 16, and any policies and procedures designed to:19            (i) reflect the requirements of this Act in the 20        design of the controller's systems;21            (ii) identify and provide personal data to a 22        consumer as required by this Act;23            (iii) establish, implement, and maintain 24        reasonable administrative, technical, and physical 25        data security practices to protect the   SB3890- 39 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of 2        personal data, including the maintenance of an 3        inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 4        the responsibilities under this item;5            (iv) limit the collection of personal data to what 6        is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in 7        relation to the purposes for which the data are 8        processed;9            (v) prevent the retention of personal data that is 10        no longer relevant and reasonably necessary in 11        relation to the purposes for which the data were 12        collected and processed, unless retention of the data 13        is otherwise required by law or permitted under 14        Section 19; and15            (vi) identify and remediate violations of this 16        Act.17    (b) A controller must conduct and document a data privacy 18and protection assessment for each of the following processing 19activities involving personal data:20        (1) the processing of personal data for purposes of 21    targeted advertising;22        (2) the sale of personal data;23        (3) the processing of sensitive data;24        (4) any processing activities involving personal data 25    that present a heightened risk of harm to consumers; and26        (5) the processing of personal data for purposes of   SB3890- 40 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    profiling, where the profiling presents a reasonably 2    foreseeable risk of:3            (i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or disparate 4        impact on, consumers;5            (ii) financial, physical, or reputational injury 6        to consumers;7            (iii) a physical or other intrusion upon the 8        solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or 9        concerns, of consumers, where the intrusion would be 10        offensive to a reasonable person; or11            (iv) other substantial injury to consumers.12    (c) A data privacy and protection assessment must take 13into account the type of personal data to be processed by the 14controller, including the extent to which the personal data 15are sensitive data, and the context in which the personal data 16are to be processed.17    (d) A data privacy and protection assessment must identify 18and weigh the benefits that may flow directly and indirectly 19from the processing to the controller, consumer, other 20stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to 21the rights of the consumer associated with the processing, as 22mitigated by safeguards that can be employed by the controller 23to reduce the potential risks. The use of deidentified data 24and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the 25context of the processing and the relationship between the 26controller and the consumer whose personal data will be   SB3890- 41 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1processed, must be factored into this assessment by the 2controller.3    (e) A data privacy and protection assessment must include 4the description of policies and procedures required by 5subsection (a).6    (f) As part of a civil investigative demand, the Attorney 7General may request, in writing, that a controller disclose 8any data privacy and protection assessment that is relevant to 9an investigation conducted by the Attorney General. The 10controller must make a data privacy and protection assessment 11available to the Attorney General upon a request made under 12this subsection. The Attorney General may evaluate the data 13privacy and protection assessments for compliance with this 14Act. Data privacy and protection assessments are nonpublic 15data that is data required by State or federal law that is: (1) 16not about an individual; (2) not accessible by the general 17public; and (3) accessible by the subject of the data. The 18disclosure of a data privacy and protection assessment under a 19request from the Attorney General under this subsection does 20not constitute a waiver of the attorney-client privilege or 21work product protection with respect to the assessment and any 22information contained in the assessment.23    (g) Data privacy and protection assessments or risk 24assessments conducted by a controller for the purpose of 25compliance with other laws or regulations may qualify under 26this Section if the assessments have a similar scope and   SB3890- 42 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1effect.2    (h) A single data protection assessment may address 3multiple sets of comparable processing operations that include 4similar activities. 5    Section 19. Limitations and applicability. 6    (a) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 7under this Act do not restrict a controller's or a processor's 8ability to:9        (1) comply with federal, State, or local laws, rules, 10    or regulations, including, but not limited to, data 11    retention requirements in State or federal law 12    notwithstanding a consumer's request to delete personal 13    data;14        (2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory 15    inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, 16    State, local, or other governmental authorities;17        (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning 18    conduct or activity that the controller or processor 19    reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, 20    State, or local laws, rules, or regulations;21        (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or 22    defend legal claims;23        (5) provide a product or service specifically 24    requested by a consumer; perform a contract to which the 25    consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms of a   SB3890- 43 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    written warranty; or take steps at the request of the 2    consumer prior to entering into a contract;3        (6) take immediate steps to protect an interest that 4    is essential for the life or physical safety of the 5    consumer or of another natural person, and if the 6    processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal 7    basis;8        (7) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to 9    security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, 10    malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal 11    activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; 12    or investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for 13    any such action;14        (8) assist another controller, processor, or third 15    party with any of the obligations under this subsection;16        (9) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, 17    historical, or statistical research in the public interest 18    that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy 19    laws and is approved, monitored, and governed by an 20    institutional review board, human subjects research ethics 21    review board, or a similar independent oversight entity 22    that has determined:23            (A) the research is likely to provide substantial 24        benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the 25        controller;26            (B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh   SB3890- 44 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        the privacy risks; and2            (C) the controller has implemented reasonable 3        safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with 4        research, including any risks associated with 5        reidentification; or6        (10) process personal data for the benefit of the 7    public in the areas of public health, community health, or 8    population health, but only to the extent that the 9    processing is:10            (A) subject to suitable and specific measures to 11        safeguard the rights of the consumer whose personal 12        data is being processed; and13            (B) under the responsibility of a professional 14        individual who is subject to confidentiality 15        obligations under federal, State, or local law.16    (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 17under this Act do not restrict a controller's or processor's 18ability to collect, use, or retain data to:19        (1) effectuate a product recall or identify and repair 20    technical errors that impair existing or intended 21    functionality;22        (2) perform internal operations that are reasonably 23    aligned with the expectations of the consumer based on the 24    consumer's existing relationship with the controller, or 25    are otherwise compatible with processing in furtherance of 26    the provision of a product or service specifically   SB3890- 45 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract 2    to which the consumer is a party; or3        (3) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or 4    repair products, services, or technology.5    (c) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 6under this Act do not apply if compliance by the controller or 7processor with this Act would violate an evidentiary privilege 8under Illinois law and do not prevent a controller or 9processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer 10to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under Illinois 11law as part of a privileged communication.12    (d) A controller or processor that discloses personal data 13to a third-party controller or processor in compliance with 14the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this Act if 15the recipient processes the personal data in violation of this 16Act, provided that at the time of disclosing the personal 17data, the disclosing controller or processor did not have 18actual knowledge that the recipient intended to commit a 19violation. A third-party controller or processor receiving 20personal data from a controller or processor in compliance 21with the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this 22Act for the obligations of the controller or processor from 23which the third-party controller or processor receives the 24personal data.25    (e) Obligations imposed on controllers and processors 26under this Act shall not:  SB3890- 46 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (1) adversely affect the rights or freedoms of any 2    persons, including exercising the right of free speech 3    pursuant to the First Amendment of the United States 4    Constitution; or5        (2) apply to the processing of personal data by a 6    natural person in the course of a purely personal or 7    household activity.8    (f) Personal data that are processed by a controller 9pursuant to this Section may be processed solely to the extent 10that the processing is:11        (1) necessary, reasonable, and proportionate to the 12    purposes listed in this Section;13        (2) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is 14    necessary in relation to the specific purpose or purposes 15    listed in this Section; and16        (3) insofar as possible, taking into account the 17    nature and purpose of processing the personal data, 18    subjected to reasonable administrative, technical, and 19    physical measures to protect the confidentiality, 20    integrity, and accessibility of the personal data, and to 21    reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to consumers.22    (g) If a controller processes personal data under an 23exemption in this Section, the controller bears the burden of 24demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the exemption 25and complies with the requirements in subsection (f).26    (h) Processing personal data solely for the purposes   SB3890- 47 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1expressly identified in subsection (a), clauses (1) to (7), 2does not, by itself, make an entity a controller with respect 3to the processing. 4    Section 20. Attorney General enforcement. 5    (a) If a controller or processor violates this Act, the 6Attorney General, before filing an enforcement action under 7subsection (b), must provide the controller or processor with 8a warning letter identifying the specific provisions of this 9Act the Attorney General alleges have been or are being 10violated. If, after 30 days of issuance of the warning letter, 11the Attorney General believes the controller or processor has 12failed to cure any alleged violation, the Attorney General may 13bring an enforcement action under subsection (b). This 14subsection expires January 1, 2028.15    (b) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against 16a controller or processor to enforce a provision of this Act. 17If the State prevails in an action to enforce this Act, the 18State may, in addition to penalties provided by subsection (c) 19or other remedies provided by law, be allowed an amount 20determined by the court to be the reasonable value of all or 21part of the State's litigation expenses incurred.22    (c) Any controller or processor that violates this Act is 23subject to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not 24more than $7,500 for each violation.25    (d) Nothing in this Act establishes a private right of   SB3890- 48 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1action for a violation of this Act or any other law. 2    Section 95. Home rule. A unit of local government, 3including a home rule unit, may not regulate consumer data 4privacy. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 5powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of 6Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 7    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 8Section 5.1038 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)10    Sec. 5.1038. The Data Privacy Protection Fund. 11    Section 905. The Personal Information Protection Act is 12amended by adding Sections 55, 60, and 65 as follows: 13    (815 ILCS 530/55 new)14    Sec. 55. Data broker registry.15    (a) As used in this Section, "data broker" means a 16business that knowingly collects and sells to third parties 17the personal information of a consumer with whom the business 18does not have a direct relationship. "Data broker" does not 19include:20        (1) an entity to the extent that it is covered by the 21    federal Fair Credit Reporting Act;  SB3890- 49 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (2) an entity to the extent that it is covered by the 2    Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and its implementing regulations; 3    or4        (3) an entity that collects information that is 5    processed for purposes of providing compliance, enrollment 6    or degree verification, or research services by a 7    nonprofit organization that is established to provide 8    enrollment data reporting services on behalf of 9    postsecondary schools.10    (b) Annually, on or before January 31, a data broker 11operating in this State must register with the Attorney 12General.13    (c) In registering with the Attorney General, a data 14broker must pay a registration fee in an amount determined by 15the Attorney General not to exceed the reasonable costs of 16establishing and maintaining the informational Internet 17website described in Section 60. A data broker must also 18provide the following information:19        (1) the name of the data broker and its primary 20    physical, email, and Internet website addresses;21        (2) whether the data broker collects the personal 22    information of minors;23        (3) whether the data broker collects consumers' 24    precise geolocation;25        (4) whether the data broker collects consumers' 26    reproductive health care data;  SB3890- 50 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (5) a link to a page on the data broker's Internet 2    website that does not make use of any dark patterns;3        (6) whether, and to what extent, the data broker or 4    any of its subsidiaries is regulated by any of the 5    following: 6            (A) the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and7            (B) the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and its 8        implementing regulations; and9        (7) any additional information or explanation the data 10    broker chooses to provide concerning its data collection 11    practices.12    (d) The Attorney General must create a page on its 13Internet website in which the registration information 14provided in subsection (c) is made accessible to the public.15    (e) A data broker that fails to register as required by 16this Section is liable for civil penalties and costs in an 17action brought by the Attorney General as follows:18        (1) a civil penalty of $200 for each day the data 19    broker fails to register as required by this Section;20        (2) an amount equal to the fees that were due during 21    the period it failed to register; and22        (3) expenses incurred by the Attorney General in the 23    investigation and administration of the action as the 24    court deems appropriate.25    (f) All moneys received by the Attorney General under this 26Section must be deposited into the Data Broker Registry Fund,   SB3890- 51 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1a special fund created in the State treasury and be used, 2subject to appropriation and as directed by the Attorney 3General, to offset all reasonable costs of enforcing the 4registration requirements described in subsection (c) and 5establishing and maintaining the Internet website in 6subsection (d). 7    (815 ILCS 530/60 new)8    Sec. 60. Registration information; disclosures. 9    (a) The Attorney General must create a page on its 10Internet website in which the registration information 11provided by data brokers described in subsection (b) of 12Section 55 and the accessible deletion mechanism described in 13Section 65 are accessible to the public.14    (b) On or before July 1 following each calendar year in 15which a business meets the definition of a data broker as 16defined by this Act, the business must do all of the following:17        (1) Compile the number of requests under subsection 18    (c) of Section 65 of this Act and Section 14 of the 19    Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act that the data broker 20    received, complied with in whole or in part, and denied 21    during the previous calendar year.22        (2) Compile the median and the mean number of days 23    within which the data broker substantively responded to 24    requests under subsection (c) of Section 65 of this Act 25    and Section 14 of the Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act   SB3890- 52 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    that the data broker received during the previous calendar 2    year.3        (3) Disclose the metrics compiled under paragraphs (1) 4    and (2) within the data broker's privacy policy posted on 5    the data broker's Internet website and accessible from a 6    link included in the data broker's privacy policy.7    (c) In its disclosure under paragraph (3) of subsection 8(b) regarding requests made under subsection (c) of Section 65 9of this Act, a data broker must disclose the number of requests 10that the data broker denied in whole or in part because of any 11of the following:12        (1) The request was not verifiable.13        (2) The request was not made by a consumer.14        (3) The request called for information exempt from 15    deletion.16        (4) The request was denied on other grounds.17    (d) In its disclosure under paragraph (3) of subsection 18(b), a data broker must, for each provision of subsection (b) 19of Section 12 of the Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act and 20under which deletion was not required, specify the number of 21requests in which deletion was not required in whole, or in 22part, under that provision. 23    (815 ILCS 530/65 new)24    Sec. 65.Deletion mechanism.25    (a) By January 1, 2027, the Attorney General, in   SB3890- 53 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1consultation with the Illinois Department of Innovation and 2Technology, must establish an accessible deletion mechanism 3that does all of the following:4        (1) Implements and maintains reasonable security 5    procedures and practices, including, but not limited to, 6    administrative, physical, and technical safeguards 7    appropriate to the nature of the information and the 8    purposes for which the personal information will be used 9    and to protect consumers' personal information from 10    unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction, or 11    modification.12        (2) Allows a consumer, through a single verifiable 13    consumer request, to request that every data broker that 14    maintains any personal information delete any personal 15    information related to that consumer held by the data 16    broker or associated service provider or contractor.17        (3) Allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific 18    data brokers from a request made under subsection (2).19        (4) Allows a consumer to make a request to alter a 20    previous request made under this Section after at least 45 21    days have passed since the consumer last made a request 22    under this Section.23    (b) The accessible deletion mechanism established in 24subsection (a) must meet all of the following requirements:25        (1) The accessible deletion mechanism must allow a 26    consumer to request the deletion of all personal   SB3890- 54 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    information related to that consumer through a single 2    deletion request.3        (2) The accessible deletion mechanism must permit a 4    consumer to securely submit information in one or more 5    privacy-protecting ways determined by the Attorney General 6    to aid in the deletion request.7        (3) The accessible deletion mechanism must allow data 8    brokers registered with the Attorney General to determine 9    whether an individual has submitted a verifiable consumer 10    request to delete the personal information related to that 11    consumer as described in paragraph (1) and may not allow 12    the disclosure of any additional personal information when 13    the data broker accesses the accessible deletion mechanism 14    unless otherwise specified in this Section.15        (4) The accessible deletion mechanism must allow a 16    consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1) 17    using an Internet service operated by the Attorney 18    General.19        (5) The accessible deletion mechanism must not charge 20    a consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1).21        (6) The accessible deletion mechanism must allow a 22    consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1) in 23    any language spoken by any consumer for whom personal 24    information has been collected by data brokers.25        (7) The accessible deletion mechanism must be readily 26    accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities.  SB3890- 55 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1        (8) The accessible deletion mechanism must support the 2    ability of a consumer's authorized agents to aid in the 3    deletion request.4        (9) The accessible deletion mechanism must allow the 5    consumer or an authorized agent to verify the status of 6    the consumer's deletion request.7        (10) The accessible deletion mechanism must provide a 8    description of all of the following:9            (A) The deletion permitted by this Section, 10        including, but not limited to, the actions required by 11        subsections (c) and (d).12            (B) The process for submitting a deletion request 13        under this Section.14            (C) Examples of the types of information that may 15        be deleted.16    (c)(1) Beginning August 1, 2027, a data broker must access 17the accessible deletion mechanism established under subsection 18(a) at least once every 45 days and do all of the following:19        (A) Within 45 days after receiving a request made 20    under this Section, process all deletion requests made 21    under this Section and delete all personal information 22    related to the consumers making the requests consistent 23    with the requirements of this section.24        (B) In cases in which a data broker denies a consumer 25    request to delete because the request cannot be verified, 26    process the request as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of   SB3890- 56 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    the consumer's personal information as provided for under 2    Section 14 of the Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act and 3    limited by that Act.4        (C) Direct all service providers or contractors 5    associated with the data broker to delete all personal 6    information in their possession related to the consumers 7    making the requests described in subparagraph (A) of 8    paragraph (1) of subsection (c).9        (D) Direct all service providers or contractors 10    associated with the data broker to process a request 11    described by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of 12    subsection (c) as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the 13    consumer's personal information as provided for under 14    Section 14 of the Illinois Data Privacy Protection Act and 15    limited by that Act.16    (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a data broker may not 17be required to delete a consumer's personal information if 18either of the following apply:19        (A) It is reasonably necessary for the data broker to 20    maintain the personal information to fulfill a purpose 21    described in Section 19 of the Illinois Data Privacy 22    Protection Act.23        (B) The deletion is not required under Section 14 and 24    subsection (b) of Section 12 of the Illinois Data Privacy 25    Protection Act.26    (3) Personal information described in paragraph (2) may   SB3890- 57 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1only be used for the purposes described in paragraph (2) and 2may not be used or disclosed for any other purpose, including, 3but not limited to, marketing purposes.4    (d)(1) Beginning August 1, 2027, after a consumer has 5submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the 6consumer's data under this Section, the data broker must 7delete all personal information of the consumer at least once 8every 45 days under this Section unless the consumer requests 9otherwise or the deletion is not required under paragraph (2) 10of subsection (c).11    (2) Beginning August 1, 2027, after a consumer has 12submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the 13consumer's data under this Section, the data broker may not 14sell or share new personal information of the consumer unless 15the consumer requests otherwise or selling or sharing the 16personal information is permitted under Section 14 and 17subsection (b) of Section 12 of the Illinois Data Privacy 18Protection Act.19    (e)(1) Beginning January 1, 2029, and every 3 years 20thereafter, a data broker must undergo an audit by an 21independent third party to determine compliance with this 22Section.23    (2) For an audit completed under paragraph (1), the data 24broker must submit a report resulting from the audit and any 25related materials to the Attorney General within 5 business 26days of a written request from the Attorney General.  SB3890- 58 -LRB104 19719 JRC 33169 b1    (3) A data broker must maintain the report and materials 2described in paragraph (2) for at least 6 years.3    (f) The Attorney General may charge an access fee to a data 4broker when the data broker accesses the accessible deletion 5mechanism under subsection (d) that does not exceed the 6reasonable costs of providing that access. A fee collected by 7the Attorney General under this subsection (f) must be 8deposited in the Data Privacy Protection Fund. 9    Section 997. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 10its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 11the invalidity of that provision or application does not 12affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 13be given effect without the invalid provision or application.